test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_O_miizhashk_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     miizhashk: miizhashk
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1miizhashk: nimiizhashk
     +Px2miizhashk: gimiizhashk
     +Px3miizhashk: omiizhashk
     +PxIndefmiizhashk: imiizhashk
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     miizhashk+Dim: miizhashkens
     miizhashk+Con: miizhashkenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     miizhashk+Pos: miizhashkim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     miizhashk+Pej: miizhashkish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     miizhashk+Pos1Pl: miizhashkinaan
     miizhashk+PosPl: miizhashkiwaa
     miizhashk+PosObv: miizhashkini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     miizhashk+Pret: miizhashkiban
     miizhashk+VocPl: miizhashk***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     miizhashk+Obv: miizhashkan
     miizhashk+Pl: miizhashkag
     miizhashk+Loc: miizhashking
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim: nimiizhashkens
     +Px1miizhashk+Con: nimiizhashkenh
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim: gimiizhashkens
     +Px2miizhashk+Con: gimiizhashkenh
     +Px3miizhashk+Dim: omiizhashkens
     +Px3miizhashk+Con: omiizhashkenh
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim: imiizhashkens
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con: imiizhashkenh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1miizhashk+Pos: nimiizhashkim
     +Px2miizhashk+Pos: gimiizhashkim
     +Px3miizhashk+Pos: omiizhashkim
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Pos: imiizhashkim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1miizhashk+Pej: nimiizhashkish
     +Px2miizhashk+Pej: gimiizhashkish
     +Px3miizhashk+Pej: omiizhashkish
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Pej: imiizhashkish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1miizhashk+Pos1Pl: nimiizhashkinaan
     +Px1miizhashk+PosPl: nimiizhashkiwaa
     +Px1miizhashk+PosObv: nimiizhashkini
     +Px2miizhashk+Pos1Pl: gimiizhashkinaan
     +Px2miizhashk+PosPl: gimiizhashkiwaa
     +Px2miizhashk+PosObv: gimiizhashkini
     +Px3miizhashk+Pos1Pl: omiizhashkinaan
     +Px3miizhashk+PosPl: omiizhashkiwaa
     +Px3miizhashk+PosObv: omiizhashkini
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Pos1Pl: imiizhashkinaan
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+PosPl: imiizhashkiwaa
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+PosObv: imiizhashkini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1miizhashk+Pret: nimiizhashkiban
     +Px1miizhashk+VocPl: nimiizhashk***idig, idog***
     +Px2miizhashk+Pret: gimiizhashkiban
     +Px2miizhashk+VocPl: gimiizhashk***idig, idog***
     +Px3miizhashk+Pret: omiizhashkiban
     +Px3miizhashk+VocPl: omiizhashk***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Pret: imiizhashkiban
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+VocPl: imiizhashk***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1miizhashk+Obv: nimiizhashkan
     +Px1miizhashk+Pl: nimiizhashkag
     +Px1miizhashk+Loc: nimiizhashking
     +Px2miizhashk+Obv: gimiizhashkan
     +Px2miizhashk+Pl: gimiizhashkag
     +Px2miizhashk+Loc: gimiizhashking
     +Px3miizhashk+Obv: omiizhashkan
     +Px3miizhashk+Pl: omiizhashkag
     +Px3miizhashk+Loc: omiizhashking
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Obv: imiizhashkan
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Pl: imiizhashkag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Loc: imiizhashking
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos: miizhashkensim
     miizhashk+Con+Pos: miizhashkenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     miizhashk+Dim+Pej: miizhashkensish
     miizhashk+Con+Pej: miizhashkenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     miizhashk+Dim+Pos1Pl: miizhashkensinaan
     miizhashk+Dim+PosPl: miizhashkensiwaa
     miizhashk+Dim+PosObv: miizhashkensini
     miizhashk+Con+Pos1Pl: miizhashkenhinaan
     miizhashk+Con+PosPl: miizhashkenhiwaa
     miizhashk+Con+PosObv: miizhashkenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     miizhashk+Dim+Pret: miizhashkensiban
     miizhashk+Dim+VocPl: miizhashkens***idig, idog***
     miizhashk+Con+Pret: miizhashkenhiban
     miizhashk+Con+VocPl: miizhashkenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     miizhashk+Dim+Obv: miizhashkensan
     miizhashk+Dim+Pl: miizhashkensag
     miizhashk+Dim+Loc: miizhashkensing
     miizhashk+Con+Obv: miizhashkenhan
     miizhashk+Con+Pl: miizhashkenhag
     miizhashk+Con+Loc: miizhashkenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     miizhashk+Pos+Pej: miizhashkimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     miizhashk+Pos+Pos1Pl: miizhashkiminaan
     miizhashk+Pos+PosPl: miizhashkimiwaa
     miizhashk+Pos+PosObv: miizhashkimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     miizhashk+Pos+Pret: miizhashkimiban
     miizhashk+Pos+VocPl: miizhashkim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     miizhashk+Pos+Obv: miizhashkiman
     miizhashk+Pos+Pl: miizhashkimag
     miizhashk+Pos+Loc: miizhashkiming
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     miizhashk+Pej+Pos1Pl: miizhashkishinaan
     miizhashk+Pej+PosPl: miizhashkishiwaa
     miizhashk+Pej+PosObv: miizhashkishini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     miizhashk+Pej+Pret: miizhashkishiban
     miizhashk+Pej+VocPl: miizhashkish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     miizhashk+Pej+Obv: miizhashkishan
     miizhashk+Pej+Pl: miizhashkishag
     miizhashk+Pej+Loc: miizhashkishing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     miizhashk+Pos1Pl+Pret: miizhashkinaaniban
     miizhashk+Pos1Pl+VocPl: miizhashkinaan***idig, idog***
     miizhashk+PosPl+Pret: miizhashkiwaaiban
     miizhashk+PosPl+VocPl: miizhashkiwaa***idig, idog***
     miizhashk+PosObv+Pret: miizhashkiniiban
     miizhashk+PosObv+VocPl: miizhashkini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     miizhashk+Pos1Pl+Obv: miizhashkinaanan
     miizhashk+Pos1Pl+Pl: miizhashkinaanag
     miizhashk+Pos1Pl+Loc: miizhashkinaaning
     miizhashk+PosPl+Obv: miizhashkiwaaan
     miizhashk+PosPl+Pl: miizhashkiwaaag
     miizhashk+PosPl+Loc: miizhashkiwaaing
     miizhashk+PosObv+Obv: miizhashkinian
     miizhashk+PosObv+Pl: miizhashkiniag
     miizhashk+PosObv+Loc: miizhashkiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     miizhashk+Pret+Obv: miizhashkibanan
     miizhashk+Pret+Pl: miizhashkibanag
     miizhashk+Pret+Loc: miizhashkibaning
     miizhashk+VocPl+Obv: miizhashk***idig, idog***an
     miizhashk+VocPl+Pl: miizhashk***idig, idog***ag
     miizhashk+VocPl+Loc: miizhashk***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pos: nimiizhashkensim
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pos: nimiizhashkenhim
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+Pos: gimiizhashkensim
     +Px2miizhashk+Con+Pos: gimiizhashkenhim
     +Px3miizhashk+Dim+Pos: omiizhashkensim
     +Px3miizhashk+Con+Pos: omiizhashkenhim
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos: imiizhashkensim
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos: imiizhashkenhim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pej: nimiizhashkensish
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pej: nimiizhashkenhish
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+Pej: gimiizhashkensish
     +Px2miizhashk+Con+Pej: gimiizhashkenhish
     +Px3miizhashk+Dim+Pej: omiizhashkensish
     +Px3miizhashk+Con+Pej: omiizhashkenhish
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pej: imiizhashkensish
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pej: imiizhashkenhish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pos1Pl: nimiizhashkensinaan
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+PosPl: nimiizhashkensiwaa
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+PosObv: nimiizhashkensini
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pos1Pl: nimiizhashkenhinaan
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+PosPl: nimiizhashkenhiwaa
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+PosObv: nimiizhashkenhini
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+Pos1Pl: gimiizhashkensinaan
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+PosPl: gimiizhashkensiwaa
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+PosObv: gimiizhashkensini
     +Px2miizhashk+Con+Pos1Pl: gimiizhashkenhinaan
     +Px2miizhashk+Con+PosPl: gimiizhashkenhiwaa
     +Px2miizhashk+Con+PosObv: gimiizhashkenhini
     +Px3miizhashk+Dim+Pos1Pl: omiizhashkensinaan
     +Px3miizhashk+Dim+PosPl: omiizhashkensiwaa
     +Px3miizhashk+Dim+PosObv: omiizhashkensini
     +Px3miizhashk+Con+Pos1Pl: omiizhashkenhinaan
     +Px3miizhashk+Con+PosPl: omiizhashkenhiwaa
     +Px3miizhashk+Con+PosObv: omiizhashkenhini
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pos1Pl: imiizhashkensinaan
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+PosPl: imiizhashkensiwaa
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+PosObv: imiizhashkensini
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pos1Pl: imiizhashkenhinaan
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+PosPl: imiizhashkenhiwaa
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+PosObv: imiizhashkenhini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pret: nimiizhashkensiban
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+VocPl: nimiizhashkens***idig, idog***
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pret: nimiizhashkenhiban
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+VocPl: nimiizhashkenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+Pret: gimiizhashkensiban
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+VocPl: gimiizhashkens***idig, idog***
     +Px2miizhashk+Con+Pret: gimiizhashkenhiban
     +Px2miizhashk+Con+VocPl: gimiizhashkenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3miizhashk+Dim+Pret: omiizhashkensiban
     +Px3miizhashk+Dim+VocPl: omiizhashkens***idig, idog***
     +Px3miizhashk+Con+Pret: omiizhashkenhiban
     +Px3miizhashk+Con+VocPl: omiizhashkenh***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pret: imiizhashkensiban
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+VocPl: imiizhashkens***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pret: imiizhashkenhiban
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+VocPl: imiizhashkenh***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Obv: nimiizhashkensan
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Pl: nimiizhashkensag
     +Px1miizhashk+Dim+Loc: nimiizhashkensing
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Obv: nimiizhashkenhan
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Pl: nimiizhashkenhag
     +Px1miizhashk+Con+Loc: nimiizhashkenhing
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+Obv: gimiizhashkensan
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+Pl: gimiizhashkensag
     +Px2miizhashk+Dim+Loc: gimiizhashkensing
     +Px2miizhashk+Con+Obv: gimiizhashkenhan
     +Px2miizhashk+Con+Pl: gimiizhashkenhag
     +Px2miizhashk+Con+Loc: gimiizhashkenhing
     +Px3miizhashk+Dim+Obv: omiizhashkensan
     +Px3miizhashk+Dim+Pl: omiizhashkensag
     +Px3miizhashk+Dim+Loc: omiizhashkensing
     +Px3miizhashk+Con+Obv: omiizhashkenhan
     +Px3miizhashk+Con+Pl: omiizhashkenhag
     +Px3miizhashk+Con+Loc: omiizhashkenhing
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Obv: imiizhashkensan
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Pl: imiizhashkensag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Dim+Loc: imiizhashkensing
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Obv: imiizhashkenhan
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Pl: imiizhashkenhag
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Con+Loc: imiizhashkenhing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1miizhashk+Pos+Pej: nimiizhashkimish
     +Px2miizhashk+Pos+Pej: gimiizhashkimish
     +Px3miizhashk+Pos+Pej: omiizhashkimish
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Pos+Pej: imiizhashkimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1miizhashk+Pos+Pos1Pl: nimiizhashkiminaan
     +Px1miizhashk+Pos+PosPl: nimiizhashkimiwaa
     +Px1miizhashk+Pos+PosObv: nimiizhashkimini
     +Px2miizhashk+Pos+Pos1Pl: gimiizhashkiminaan
     +Px2miizhashk+Pos+PosPl: gimiizhashkimiwaa
     +Px2miizhashk+Pos+PosObv: gimiizhashkimini
     +Px3miizhashk+Pos+Pos1Pl: omiizhashkiminaan
     +Px3miizhashk+Pos+PosPl: omiizhashkimiwaa
     +Px3miizhashk+Pos+PosObv: omiizhashkimini
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Pos+Pos1Pl: imiizhashkiminaan
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Pos+PosPl: imiizhashkimiwaa
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Pos+PosObv: imiizhashkimini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1miizhashk+Pos+Pret: nimiizhashkimiban
     +Px1miizhashk+Pos+VocPl: nimiizhashkim***idig, idog***
     +Px2miizhashk+Pos+Pret: gimiizhashkimiban
     +Px2miizhashk+Pos+VocPl: gimiizhashkim***idig, idog***
     +Px3miizhashk+Pos+Pret: omiizhashkimiban
     +Px3miizhashk+Pos+VocPl: omiizhashkim***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Pos+Pret: imiizhashkimiban
     +PxIndefmiizhashk+Pos+VocPl: imiizhashkim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1miizhashk+Pos+Obv: nimiizhashkiman
